src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
| **@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@**  | is used to force hyphenation/non-reduction: samediggi-
| **@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@**  | is used to force reduction w/o hyphen: samedigge#xxx
| **@C.NeedsVowRed@**  | Clearing this feature, so that it doesn't interfere with further compounding
| **@C.Px@**  | Clear px
| **@C.Nom3Px@**  | 
| **@P.Px.add@**  | 
| **@R.Px.add@**  | 
| **@P.Px.block@**  | 
| **@D.Px.block@**  | 
| **@P.Nom12Px.add@**  | 
| **@R.Nom12Px.add@**  | 
| **@P.Nom3Px.add@**  | 
| **@R.Nom3Px.add@**  | 
| **@P.Vgen.add@**  | 
| **@R.Vgen.add@**  | 
| **@R.SpellRlx.ON@**  | Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
| **@D.SpellRlx.ON@**  | Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
| **@C.SpellRlx@**  | Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
| **@R.SpaceCmp.ON@**  | Flag to tag compounds written with a space
| **@D.SpaceCmp.ON@**  | Flag to tag compounds written with a space
| **@C.SpaceCmp@**  | Flag to tag compounds written with a space

Use the following flag diacritics to control harmony in numeral case inflection

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  **@U.Case.SgNom@** | Unifies with case Nominative
|  **@U.Case.PlNom@** | Unifies with case Nominative
|  **@U.Case.SgAcc@** | Unifies with case Accusative
|  **@U.Case.PlAcc@** | Unifies with case Accusative
|  **@U.Case.SgGen@** | Unifies with case Genitive
|  **@U.Case.PlGen@** | Unifies with case Genitive
|  **@U.Case.SgLoc@** | Unifies with case Locative
|  **@U.Case.PlLoc@** | Unifies with case Locative
|  **@U.Case.SgIll@** | Unifies with case Illative
|  **@U.Case.PlIll@** | Unifies with case Illative
|  **@U.Case.SgCom@** | Unifies with case Comitative
|  **@U.Case.PlCom@** | Unifies with case Comitative
|  **@U.Case.SgAbe@** | Unifies with case Abessive
|  **@U.Case.Ess@** | Unifies with case Essive
|  **@U.Number.Sg@** | Unifies with number Singular - perhaps not in use
|  **@U.Number.Pl@** | Unifies with number Plural - perhaps not in use

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files

# Lexicon Root where everyting starts
* **@U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNoun ;**  propernouns, always uppercase
* **@U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNoun ;**  propernouns, downcased for derivations: aanaarlâš
* **Abbreviation ;** 
* **Acronym ;** 
* **AdjectiveRoot ;** 
* **NounRoot ;** 
* **VerbRoot ;** 
* **Adverb ;** 
* **Particle ;** 
* **Subjunction ;** 
* **Conjunction ;** 
* **Adposition ;** 
* **Interjection ;** 
* **Numeral ;** 
* **Pronoun ;** 
* **Punctuation ;** 
* **Symbols ;** 

We split of the 3 lexica defined above already here:

* **LEXICON Abbreviation** directing to both smi (common) and smn abbrs.
	* **Abbreviation-smn ;** 
	* **Abbreviation-smi ;** 

* **LEXICON Acronym** splitting in common and smn
	* **Acronym-smi ;** 
	* **Acronym-smn ;** 

* **LEXICON ProperNoun** point
	* **Prefix-Proper ;** 
	* **ProperNoun-smn ;** 
	* **@N.CmpHyph.TRUE@ ProperNoun-smi-nocomp ;**  Lexicon for short names - always require hyphen
	* **ProperNoun-smi ;** 

# Lexicon ENDLEX 
And this is the ENDLEX of everything:
```
**@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@@D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;** 
```
The `@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@` flag diacritic is ued to disallow words tagged
with +CmpNP/Only to end here.
The `@D.NeedNoun.ON@` flag diacritic is used to block illegal compounds.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
